src/morphology/phonology.twolc
"i2e"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 i:e <=> Cns _ (HarmDummies:) ( %^XStrGStem: | %^StrGStem: ) %^PLPRT: ;
! Cns 0:? _ (HarmDummies:) ( %^XStrGStem: | %^StrGStem: ) %^PLPRT: ;
!!€ pin0i%^StrGStem%^PLPRT
!!€ pinne00
! # Cns* _ i: l (HarmDummies:) %^VOWLower: ;
! # Cns* i: _ l (HarmDummies:) %^VOWLower: ;
!!€ kiil%^VOWLower%>e
!!€ keel0%>e
     e _ Cns: (HarmDummies:) %^ÄI2ÄÄ: ;
!!€ leib%^ÄI2ÄÄ%^WGStem%>ä
!!€ leev0%>ä
  Cns* _ %{tdØ%}: ä: (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^VOWLower: ;
!!pidämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: 
!!€ pi%{tdØ%}ä%{front%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%{eõ%}%>t%{aä%}s
!!€ pe0000000e%>täs


"i:ä"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 i:ä <=> ä _ Cns: (HarmDummies:) %^ÄI2ÄÄ: ;
!!€ päiv%^ÄI2ÄÄ%>ä
!!€ pääv0%>ä


"a2o"!prepare for deprication to {ao}:o
!! __@RULENAME@__
!! {{{
 a:o <=> OnSetC  _ (HarmDummies:) ( %^XStrGStem: | %^StrGStem: | PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem: ) %^PLPRT: ;
!!€ kan0a%^StrGStem%^PLPRT
!!€ kanno00
!! }}}

"{ao}o"
!! __@RULENAME@__
!! {{{
 %{ao%}:o <=> OnSetC  _ (HarmDummies:) ( %^G4: | %^G3: | PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^G1: ) %^PLPRT: ;
!!€ ka%{nØ%}n%{ao%}%^G3%^PLPRT
!!€ kanno00
!! }}}



!! !VOWEL LOSS
"a:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 a:0 <=> [ Cns:| ArchCns: ] _ (HarmDummies:) [ (%^StrGStem:|PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem:|%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^G2:) %^VowRM: | CnsInZero: %^VowRM: %^WGStem: %> ]  ; 
! [ Cns:| ArchCns: ] _ (HarmDummies:) [ (%^StrGStem:|PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem:|%^Pen: %^CC2C:) (0:) %^VowRM: | CnsInZero: %^VowRM: %^CnsRM: %> ]  ; 
      a _ (HarmDummies:) %>  i  ; !!= @CODE@ 
!!€ saa%>i
!!€ sa0%>i
!!€ sõima0%^VowRM%>si
!!€ sõim0s0%>si
  [Cns:| ArchCns: ]  _ Cns: (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^VowRM: ;
!!€ puhkas%^Pen%^VowRM%>a%>ma
!!€ puhk0s00%>a%>ma
  _  [%{hØ%}: | %{sØ%}:] (HarmDummies:) %^VowRM:  ;
    _ (HarmDummies:) VOWHite (%^Pen: (%^WGStem:|%^StrGStem:|%^XStrGStem:)) %^VowRM: ;

"ä:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 ä:0 <=>  [ Cns: | :Cns | ArchCns:] _ (s:) (HarmDummies:) [ (%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^G2:) %^VowRM: | CnsInZero: %^VowRM: %^WGStem:  %> | [%^StrGStem: | %^XStrGStem: ] %> i  ] ; 
!  [ Cns: | :Cns | ArchCns:] _ (s:) (HarmDummies:) [ (0:) (%^Pen: %^CC2C:) %^VowRM: | CnsInZero: %^VowRM: %^CnsRM:  %> | [%^StrGStem: | %^XStrGStem: ] %> i  ] ; 
    _ (HarmDummies:) ((%^Pen: ) %^VOWLower:) (%^Pen: (%^WGStem:|%^StrGStem:|%^XStrGStem:)) %^VowRM: ;
!  [ Cns: | :Cns ] _ (HarmDummies:) [ (0:|:0+) %^VowRM: | CnsInZero: %^VowRM: %^CnsRM:  %> | [%^StrGStem: | %^XStrGStem: ] %> i  ] ; 
                        ä _ (HarmDummies:) VOWHite %^VowRM:  ;
!!€ jää%^VOWRaise%^VowRM%>i
!!€ jä000%>i
!!€ elä%>et
!!€ el0%>et
  [Cns:| ArchCns: ] _ Cns: (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^VowRM: ;
!!€ tütär%^Pen%^VowRM%>e
!!€ tüt0r0%>e
 _  [%{hØ%}: | %{sØ%}: ] (HarmDummies:) %^VowRM:  ;

"u:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
!! {{{
 u:0 <=> 
  [ Cns: | :Cns |ArchCns:] _ (s:) (HarmDummies:)  PenVOWHite (%^Pen: [%^G1:|%^G2:|%^G3:|%^G4:| %^CC2C:|%^StrGStem:]) %^VowRM: (õ)    ; 
! [Cns:|ArchCns:| Vow: ] _ (s:) (HarmDummies:) [ (%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^G3:|%^Pen: %^G2:|%^Pen: %^G4:|PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^G1:|%^VOWRaise:) %^VowRM: | CnsInZero: (%^Pen: %^CC2C:) %^VowRM: %^CnsRM: ]  ; 
!!€ hirnu%{back%}%^Pen%^CC2C%^VowRM%>m%{aä%}
!!€ hirn00000%>ma
!!€ tervüs%^VowRM%^CnsRM%>i%>t
!!€ terv0000%>i%>t
!! juusk+N+Sg+Nom: ____
!!€ j%{ou%}%{ou%}s%{kØ%}u%^VOWRaise%^VowRM
!!€ juusk000

   OnSetC u: _ (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^CC2C:) %^VowRM:  ;
!   OnSetC u: _ (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^CC2C:) %^VowRM: %> i ;
!!€ kuu%^VowRM%>i%>d
!!€ ku00%>i%>d
    _ (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite (%^Pen: %^WGStem:|%^Pen: %^StrGStem: ) %^VowRM: ;
!! }}}

"ü:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
!! {{{
 ü:0 <=>
  [ Cns: |ArchCns:| Vow: ] _ (s:) (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite [(%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^G1:|%^Pen: %^G2:|%^Pen: %^G3:|%^Pen: %^G4:|%^Pen: %^StrGStem:) %^VowRM: | CnsInZero: (%^Pen: %^CC2C:) %^VowRM: %^WGStem: ]  ; 
!  [ Cns: |ArchCns:| Vow: ] _ (s:) (HarmDummies:) [(%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^G3:|%^Pen: %^G4:|PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^G1:) %^VowRM: | CnsInZero: (%^Pen: %^CC2C:) %^VowRM: %^CnsRM: ]  ; 
!!€ tüü%^VowRM%>hüq
!!€ tü00%>hüq
!!€ tervüs%^VowRM%^WGStem%>i%>t
!!€ terv0000%>i%>t
   OnSetC ü: _ (HarmDummies:) VOWHite %> i ;
    _ (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite (%^Pen: %^WGStem:|%^Pen: %^StrGStem: ) %^VowRM: ;
    _ (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite (%^Pen: %^G3:|%^Pen: %^G4:) %^VowRM: ;
!! }}}

"e:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 e:0 <=>  [ Cns: | :Cns |ArchCns:] _ (s:) (HarmDummies:) [(%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^StrGStem:|%^Pen: %^XStrGStem:|PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem:) %^VowRM: | CnsInZero: (%^Pen: %^CC2C:) %^VowRM: %^WGStem: ]  ; 
           [ Cns: | :Cns ] _ l (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^VowRM:  ;
           e: _ VOWHite %^VowRM: ;
	   _  [%{hØ%}: | %{sØ%}: ] (HarmDummies:) %^VowRM:  ;
!!€ herne%{hØ%}%{front%}%^VowRM%^WGStem%>id%{eõ%}
!!€ hern00000%>ide
    _ (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite (%^Pen: %^WGStem:) %^VowRM: ;

"o:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 o:0 <=>  [ Cns: | :Cns |ArchCns:] _ (s:) (HarmDummies:) [ (PenVOWHite %^Pen: [%^G1:|%^G2:|%^G3:|%^G4:|%^StrGStem:]|%^Pen: %^CC2C:) %^VowRM: (õ) ]   ; 
           o: _ (HarmDummies:) [VOWHite %^VowRM:|%^OO2Õ:] ;
!!€ joo%^VOWRaise%^VowRM%>vv%>aq
!!€ ju000%>vv%>aq
    _ (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite (%^Pen: %^WGStem:|%^Pen: %^StrGStem:) %^VowRM: ;
    _ (HarmDummies:) VOWHite  %^VowRM: ;

"Vx%{ou%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 Vx:0 <=>
     Vx: _ (HarmDummies:) [VOWHite %^VowRM:|%^OO2Õ:] ;
!!€ joo%^VOWRaise%^VowRM%>vv%>aq
!!€ ju000%>vv%>aq
          where Vx in (%{ou%} %{öü%} %{ei%} %{õy%} ) ;

"Vx%{äe%}:0 Passive stem vowel"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 Vx:0 <=>
     _ (HarmDummies:) [(%^VOWRaise:|%^Pen: %^VOWRaise: |%^Pen: %^VOWLower: |%^VOWLower:|PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem:) %^VowRM:] ;
          where Vx in (%{aõ%} %{ae%} %{äe%} ) ;


"ö:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 ö:0 <=>  [ Cns: | :Cns |ArchCns:] _ (s:) (HarmDummies:) [  (PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem:|%^Pen: %^StrGStem:|%^Pen: %^XStrGStem:|%^Pen: %^CC2C:) %^VowRM: (e) ]   ; 
           ö: _ (HarmDummies:) [VOWHite %^VowRM:|%^OO2Õ:] ;
    _ (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite (%^Pen: %^WGStem:) %^VowRM: ;

"i:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 i:0 <=>  [ Cns: | :Cns |ArchCns:] _ (s:) (HarmDummies:) [ (%^Pen: %^CC2C:|PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem:|%^Pen: %^StrGStem:|%^Pen: %^XStrGStem:|%^TS2S:) %^VowRM: (õ|e) | CnsInZero: %^Pen: %^VowRM: %^WGStem: ]  ; 
!! hüdsi+N+Sg+Par:
!!€ hüdsi%^TS2S%^VowRM%>t
!!€ hü0s000%>t
          Vow %{lØ%}:l l %>: _ (HarmDummies:) [õ|e] ;
!          Vow l 0:l %>: _ (HarmDummies:) [õ|e] ;
       a _ g: (HarmDummies:) %^WGStem: %> [o:|e:] ;
       a _ g: [o:|e:] (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem:  ;
!!€ aigo%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ a00o00

!2019-01-19    Vow [ %^I7: | %^V7: 0: ] Vow: (HarmDummies:) %^StrGStem: %> _ ;
!!€ va%^I7o%^StrGStem%>i
!!€ vaio0%>0
!!€ hä%^V70ö%^StrGStem%>i
!!€ hävvü0%>0
    _ (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite (%^Pen: %^WGStem:) %^VowRM: ;


"õ:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 õ:0 <=>  [ Cns: | :Cns |ArchCns:] _ [ l | r | %{lĺ%}: | %{rŕ%}: ] (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^StrGStem:|PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem:) %^Pen: %^VowRM:  ;
!!€ tapõl%^Pen%^VowRMõ%>ma
!!€ tap0l0õ%>ma
!!€ kannõl%^StrGStem%^Pen%^VowRM%>õ
!!€ kand0l00%>õ
!!€ kogõr%^StrGStem%^Pen%^VowRM%>õ
!!€ kok0r00%>õ
 [Cns:|ArchCns:] _ (s:) (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower: %^Pen: %^WGStem:|%^WGStem:|%^Pen: %^StrGStem:|%^Pen: %^XStrGStem:|%^Pen: %^CC2C:|PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem:) %^VowRM:  ;
!!€ hammõ%^WGStem%^VowRM%>ihe
!!€ ham0000%>ihe
	   _  [%{hØ%}: | %{sØ%}: ] (HarmDummies:) %^VowRM:  ;
    _ (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite (%^Pen: %^WGStem:) %^VowRM: ;

"%{eØ%}: 0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{eØ%}:0 <=> _ %{lĺ%}: (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^VowRM: ;

"%{õØ%}: 0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{õØ%}:0 <=> _ %{lĺ%}: (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^VowRM: ;


!! VOWEL LENGTHENING

"%{XV%}:u"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{XV%}:u <=> [ :u (HarmDummies:) PenBetweenStemAndStemFinal | %{ou%}:u̬ (HarmDummies:) %^VOWRaise: ] ( %- ) _  ;
       [ u (HarmDummies:) | u: (HarmDummies:) PenBetweenStemAndStemFinal (%^VowRM:) | u̬: PenBetweenStemAndStemFinal (%^VowRM:)] %> h _ ;

     
"%{XV%}:ü"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{XV%}:ü <=> [:ü (HarmDummies:) PenBetweenStemAndStemFinal | %{öü%}:ü̬  (HarmDummies:) %^VOWRaise: ] ( %- ) _  ;
       [ ü (HarmDummies:) | ü: (HarmDummies:) PenBetweenStemAndStemFinal (%^VowRM:) |ü̬  (HarmDummies:) PenBetweenStemAndStemFinal (%^VowRM:) ] %> h _ ;

"%{XV%}:o"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{XV%}:o <=> :o (HarmDummies:) (PenBetweenStemAndStemFinal) ( %- ) _  ;
!!€ taso%{back%}%-%{XV%}iq
!!€ taso0%-oiq
     
"%{XV%}:a"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{XV%}:a <=> :a (HarmDummies:) PenBetweenStemAndStemFinal ( %- ) _  ;
       [ o (HarmDummies:) | a (HarmDummies:) | a: (HarmDummies:) PenBetweenStemAndStemFinal (%^VowRM:) ] %> h _ ;
           a: [r|l] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^VowRM: %> _ ; 

"%{XV%}:ä"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{XV%}:ä <=> :ä (HarmDummies:) PenBetweenStemAndStemFinal ( %- ) _  ;
       [ ö (HarmDummies:) | ä (HarmDummies:) | ä: (HarmDummies:) PenBetweenStemAndStemFinal (%^VowRM:) ] %> h _ ;
           ä: [r|l] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^VowRM: %> _ ; 

"%{XV%}:õ"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{XV%}:õ <=>
   [:õ (HarmDummies:) PenBetweenStemAndStemFinal| %{õy%}: (HarmDummies:) %^VOWRaise: ] ( %- ) _  ;
        [õ  (HarmDummies:) | õ:  (HarmDummies:) PenBetweenStemAndStemFinal (%^VowRM:) ] %> h _ ;
           õ: [r|l| %{lĺ%}: | %{rŕ%}: ] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^VowRM: (%^NoPAL:) %> _ ; 
!! kannõĺ+N+Sg+Gen: __kantele__
!!€ kan%{dn%}õ%{lĺ%}%^Pen%^VowRM%^NoPAL%>%{XV%}
!!€ kand0l000%>õ

"%{XV%}:e"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{XV%}:e <=>
       [:e (HarmDummies:) PenBetweenStemAndStemFinal|:e ] ( %- ) _  ;
!! käskmä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Neg __command/käskeä__
!!€ käs%{kØ%}%{front%}%^WGStem%>%{eõ%}%-%{XV%}iq
!!€ käs000%>e%-eiq
          [ e  (HarmDummies:) | e: (HarmDummies:) PenBetweenStemAndStemFinal (%^VowRM:)] %> h _ ;
           e: [r|l] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^VowRM: %> _ ; 

"%{XV%}:i"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{XV%}:i <=> [:i (HarmDummies:) PenBetweenStemAndStemFinal| :i (HarmDummies:) VOWHite ] ( %- ) _  ;


!!
"i2j"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 i:j <=> Vow Cns:+ Vow _ (HarmDummies:) (%^WGStem:) %> :Vow ;
! Vow _ (HarmDummies:) (%^WGStem:) %> :Vow ;
         Cns _ (HarmDummies:) %^I2J: ;
!!€ asi%^I2J%>a
!!€ asj0%>a
         Vow: _  PenBetweenStemAndStemFinal %^I2J: ;
!!€ elläi%^Pen%^WGStem%^I2J%>ä
!!€ el0äj00%>ä
!         Cns _ (HarmDummies:) %^StrGStem: %> :Vow ;

"%{ij%}:j"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{ij%}:j  <=> Vow _ (HarmDummies:) (PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^G1:) %^I2J: ;


"%{jiØ%}:j"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{jiØ%}:j  <=>
    [Cns:|ArchCns:] _ [(HarmDummies:) %^I2J: | Vow: (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^XStrGStem: ] ;

"%{jiØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{jiØ%}:0  <=>
    [Cns:|ArchCns:] _ (HarmDummies:) (%^PAL:) %^VowRM: ;
    [Cns:|ArchCns:] _ Vow: (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^PAL: PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;
!! vari+N+Sg+Gen: __shadow/varjo__
!!€ va%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%}o%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ vaŕ0o0000

"%{jØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{jØ%}:0  <=>
    [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ j: Vow: (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [%^G1:|%^WGStem:] ;
!! vari+N+Sg+Gen: __shadow/varjo__
!!€ va%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%}o%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ vaŕ0o0000
 _ Cns  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite %^Pen:|(HarmDummies:) ] %^WGStem: ;
 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ (HarmDummies:) (%^VowRM: ) %^WGStem: ;
 j _ Vow: (Cns | ArchCns: ) (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^WGStem:  ;


"u2v"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 u:v <=> u _ %> v a q ;
         u _ d: (HarmDummies:) %^WGStem: ;
!!€ juud%^WGStem%>a
!!€ juvv0%>a

"%{uv%}:v"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{uv%}:v <=> u _ %> v a q ;
         u _ [ %{dv%}:|%{gv%}:] (HarmDummies:) %^WGStem: ;
!!€ ju%{uv%}%{dv%}%^WGStem%>a
!!€ juvv0%>a
         [o|õ] _ [ %{dd́v%}:|%{gǵv%}:] (HarmDummies:) %^WGStem: ;
!! joudma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ jõ%{uv%}%{dd́v%}back%^WGStem%>i
!!€ jõvv00%>i

"%{üv%}:v"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{üv%}:v <=> ü _ (HarmDummies:) %> v ä q ;
         ü _ [%{dv%}: | %{dd́v%}:] (HarmDummies:) %^WGStem: ;
!!€ pü%{üv%}%{dd́v%}%^WGStem%>et
!!€ püvv0%>et
!!€ sü%{üv%}%{dv%}%^WGStem%>ä
!!€ süvv0%>ä
         ö _ [ %{dd́v%}:|%{gǵv%}:] (HarmDummies:) %^WGStem: ;

"%^I7:i"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %^I7:i <=> Vow _ Vow (HarmDummies:) %^StrGStem:  ;
!!€ va%^I7o%^StrGStem%>i
!!€ vaio0%>0
